Mississippi, session 2026, HB566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 17-25-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 17-25-19.  (1)  (a)  Neither the board of supervisors of any county nor the governing authority of any municipality shall adopt, enact or enforce any ordinance authorizing the use of automated recording equipment or system to enforce compliance with automobile insurance requirements, traffic signals, traffic speeds or other traffic laws, rules or regulations on any public street, road or highway within this state or to impose or collect any civil or criminal fine, fee or penalty for any such violation. (b)  Any county or municipality using automated recording equipment or system shall remove the equipment or system before October 1, 2009. (c)  Any county or municipality using automated recording equipment or system to enforce compliance with automobile insurance requirements shall remove the equipment or system before October 1, 2026. (2)  For the purposes of this section, the term "automated recording equipment or system" means a camera or optical device installed to work in conjunction with a traffic control signal or radar speed detection equipment, or both, and designed to record images that depict the license plate attached to the rear of a motor vehicle that is not operated in compliance with instructions of the traffic control signal or the posted speed limit. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.